Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1646.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 38, chapter 2.1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 38-387, to read: START_STATUTE38-387. Absence of state elected official during official state events A. By choice of the governor, either the lieutenant governor, the secretary of state, the attorney general, the state treasurer or the superintendent of public instruction shall be absent from the vicinity of the seat of government during the inauguration of state elected officials, the annual governor's state of the state address or any other state address by the governor where members of the executive department participate or are in attendance. The excused elected official shall remain at least thirty-five miles away from the seat of government during such an event. B. The department of public safety shall establish a protective detail that shall care for and protect the excused elected official. The protective detail shall provide: 1. Safe and secure housing during the event. 2. Safe transportation with an appropriate escort. 3. Appropriate and secure communications. 4. A secure announcement to all agency directors as to the excused elected official who would represent continuity of state government and a line of succession. END_STATUTE